Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska76-105
Powers of appointment, sale, and revocation; effect.

An otherwise effective exercise of power of appointment, a power of sale or a power of revocation, whether inter vivos or by a testamentary disposition, transfers or revokes the entire interest which the holder thereof has the power to transfer or to revoke unless an intent to transfer or to revoke a less interest is effectively manifested.

Laws 1941, c. 153, § 5, p. 595;

C.S.Supp.,1941, § 76-1005;

R.S.1943, § 76-105.